src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/pronouns_gt-norm.yaml
  Pronoun - divna: # Indefinitive
    divna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: []
    divna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: []
    divna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: []
    divna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: []
    divna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: []
    divna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: []
    divna+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: []
    divna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: divna
    divna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: divnaj
    divna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: divnajt
    divna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: divnajn
    divna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: divnajda
    divna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: divnajs
    divna+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: divnaj

  Pronoun - juobbá: # Indefinitive
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juobbá
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: juoppá
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: juoppáv
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: juoppán
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: juobbáj
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: juoppás
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: juoppájn
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: juoppá
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juoppáj
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: juoppájt
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: juoppájn
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: juoppájda
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: juoppájs
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juoppáj
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Ess: juobbán
